test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-05oppaja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - oppaja: # Noun (5) oppaja 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     oppaja+N+Sg+Nom: oppaja
     oppaja+N+Sg+Gen: oppaja
     oppaja+N+Sg+Par: oppajat
     oppaja+N+Sg+Ill: [oppajahe, oppajadõ]
     oppaja+N+Sg+Ine: [oppajan, oppajah, oppajahn]
     oppaja+N+Sg+Ela: oppajast
     oppaja+N+Sg+All: oppajalõ
     oppaja+N+Sg+Ade: oppajal
     oppaja+N+Sg+Abl: oppajalt
     oppaja+N+Sg+Tra: oppajas
     oppaja+N+Sg+Ter: oppajaniq
     oppaja+N+Sg+Abe: oppajaldaq
     oppaja+N+Sg+Com: oppajagaq
     oppaja+N+Pl+Nom: oppajaq
     oppaja+N+Pl+Gen: [oppajidõ, oppajiidõ]
     oppaja+N+Pl+Par: [oppajit, oppajiid]
     oppaja+N+Pl+Ill: [oppajihe, oppajiihe, oppajidõ, oppajiidõ]
     oppaja+N+Pl+Ine: [oppajin, oppajiin, oppajih, oppajiih, oppajihn, oppajiihn]
     oppaja+N+Pl+Ela: [oppajist, oppajiist]
     oppaja+N+Pl+All: [oppajilõ, oppajiilõ]    
     oppaja+N+Pl+Ade: [oppajil, oppajiil]
     oppaja+N+Pl+Abl: [oppajilt, oppajiilt]
     oppaja+N+Pl+Tra: [oppajis, oppajiis]
     oppaja+N+Pl+Ter: [oppajiniq, oppajiiniq]
     oppaja+N+Pl+Abe: [oppajildaq, oppajiildaq]
     oppaja+N+Pl+Com: [oppajidõgaq, oppajiidõgaq]
